Utah statutes.
79-2-301.   Budget.

(1)  The department shall prepare and submit to the governor, to be included in the budget to be submitted to the Legislature, a budget of the department's requirements for expenses in carrying out the provisions of law during the fiscal year next following the convening of the Legislature.

(2)  The director of each division shall prepare, with the advice of the division's policy board, a budget of expenses for the next fiscal year, which shall be submitted to the executive director to aid in the preparation of the departmental budget.

